Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-624.03
Board of directors; plan of insurance for benefit of employees and dependents; may establish.

The board of directors may establish a plan of insurance, designed and intended for the benefit of the employees of the district and the dependents of employees of the district, and, in the discretion of the board, expend funds of the district for the payment of premiums for such employees' and dependents' group, franchise, or wholesale insurance policies. Members of the board of directors of the district may be considered employees for purposes of this section. The dollar amount of any health insurance premiums paid from the funds of the district for the benefit of a member of the board of directors may be in addition to the amount of compensation authorized to be paid to such director pursuant to section 70-624.02.

Laws 1949, c. 199, § 1(4), p. 580;

Laws 1972, LB 1186, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 182, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 901, § 5.